test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_okko_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst

Tests:


  Noun - okko:
    okko+N+Sg+Nom:  okko
    okko+N+Sg+Gen:  oˊho
    okko+N+Sg+Acc:  oˊho
    okko+N+Sg+Ill:  ookon
    okko+N+Sg+Loc:  ohhoost
    okko+N+Sg+Com:  ohhoin
    okko+N+Sg+Abe:  oˊhottáá
    okko+N+Ess:  okkon
    okko+N+Par:  okkod
    okko+N+Pl+Nom:  oˊhoh
    okko+N+Pl+Gen:  oˊhoi
    okko+N+Pl+Acc:  oˊhoid
    okko+N+Pl+Ill:  ohhoid
    okko+N+Pl+Loc:  oˊhoin
    okko+N+Pl+Com:  oˊhoiguin
    okko+N+Pl+Abe:  oˊhoittáá

  Noun - lukko:
    lukko+N+Sg+Nom:  lukko
    lukko+N+Sg+Gen:  luˊho
    lukko+N+Sg+Acc:  luˊho
    lukko+N+Sg+Ill:  luukon
    lukko+N+Sg+Loc:  luhhoost
    lukko+N+Sg+Com:  luhhoin
    lukko+N+Sg+Abe:  luˊhottáá
    lukko+N+Ess:  lukkon
    lukko+N+Par:  lukkod
    lukko+N+Pl+Nom:  luˊhoh
    lukko+N+Pl+Gen:  luˊhoi
    lukko+N+Pl+Acc:  luˊhoid
    lukko+N+Pl+Ill:  luhhoid
    lukko+N+Pl+Loc:  luˊhoin
    lukko+N+Pl+Com:  luˊhoiguin
    lukko+N+Pl+Abe:  luˊhoittáá
